District of Columbia statutes.
22-3052

Unlawful disclosure.

(a)

It shall be unlawful in the District of Columbia for a person to knowingly disclose one or more sexual images of another identified or identifiable person when:

(1)

The person depicted did not consent to the disclosure of the sexual image;

(2)

There was an agreement or understanding between the person depicted and the person disclosing that the sexual image would not be disclosed; and

(3)

The person disclosed the sexual image with the intent to harm the person depicted or to receive financial gain.

(b)

A person who violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisoned for not more than 180 days, or both.

May 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-275, § 3, 62 DCR 16